Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2002
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Degradable Products Act, the definitions found in sections 69-2003 to 69-2007 shall be used.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 2.